Maryland, session 2026, HB0929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
12–906.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO CARROLL COUNTY.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW AND SUBJECT
TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE CARROLL COUNTY OFFICE OF
PERMITS AND INSPECTIONS MAY DENY THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A
COMMERCIAL LICENSE OR PERMIT IN THE COUNTY IF THE APPLICANT HAS UNPAID
PERSONAL PROPERTY TAXES.
(2) THE CARROLL COUNTY OFFICE OF PERMITS AND INSPECTIONS
MAY NOT DENY THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A COMMERCIAL LICENSE OR PERMIT
FOR UNPAID PERSONAL PROPERTY TAXES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE APPLICANT SUBMITS EVIDENCE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE
OFFICE THAT THE APPLICANT HAS DISPUTED THE AMOUNT OF UNPAID PERSONAL
PROPERTY TAXES.
– 1 –

Ch. 802 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) THE CARROLL COUNTY OFFICE OF PERMITS AND INSPECTIONS MAY
ISSUE OR RENEW A COMMERCIAL LICENSE OR PERMIT IN THE COUNTY THAT WAS
DENIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IF THE APPLICANT SUBMITS
EVIDENCE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE OFFICE THAT THE APPLICANT HAS PAID
ANY PREVIOUSLY UNPAID PERSONAL PROPERTY TAXES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –